Idaho statutes. Title 43 IRRIGATION DISTRICTS
Chapter 12
ANNEXATION AND EXCLUSION OF STATE LANDS

Sec.

§ 43-1201. Resolution of board of land commissioners — Petition.

The state board of land commissioners may, by resolution duly passed at any meeting of said board and recorded in the minutes thereof, after due consideration in each specific case, authorize the governor of the state of Idaho, as chairman of said board of land commissioners, to sign a petition for the annexation of adjacent state lands of the state of Idaho to a regularly organized irrigation district, or sign a petition to exclude such state lands from an irrigation district. The governor of the state of Idaho, as chairman of the state board of land commissioners, shall be deemed the owner of said lands for the purpose of signing any petition herein authorized, with like effect as the owner of private lands.